Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.125

Inactive credential—Reinstatement.

(1) The secretary must grant a massage therapist an inactive credential if the massage therapist submits a letter to the board stating his or her intent to obtain an inactive credential, and he or she:

(a) Holds an active Washington state massage therapist's license;

(b) Is in good standing, as determined by the board; and

(c) Does not practice massage in the state of Washington.

(2) The secretary may reinstate the massage therapist's license if the massage therapist:

(a) Pays the current active renewal fee and other fees for active licensure;

(b) Provides a written declaration that:

(i) No action has been taken by a state or federal jurisdiction or a hospital which would prevent or restrict the therapist's practice of massage therapy;

(ii) He or she has not voluntarily given up any credential or privilege or been restricted in the practice of massage therapy to avoid other sanctions; and

(iii) He or she has satisfied continuing education and competency requirements for the two most recent years; and

(c) Meets other requirements for reinstatement, as may be determined by the board.

[ 2016 c 41 s 11; 2008 c 25 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Effective date—2008 c 25: See note following RCW 18.108.025.